Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB487.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Wage Theft Notification and Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Wage Theft Notification and Protection Restricted Account established under section 8."Construction Workplace Misclassification Act." The act of October 13, 2010 (P.L.506, No.72), known as the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act.12345678910111213141516171819 "Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employee." As the term "employe" is defined in section 3 of The Minimum Wage Act."Employer." An employer as defined in any of the following:(1) The Wage Payment and Collection Law.(2) The Minimum Wage Act."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth or a designee."The Minimum Wage Act." The act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968."Wage Payment and Collection Law." The act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.637, No.329), known as the Wage Payment and Collection Law."Wage theft." The failure to pay, withholding or deprivation, including the aiding thereof, of wages, gratuities, benefits or other compensation, lawfully due to an employee under the Wage Payment and Collection Law, The Minimum Wage Act, the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act or other State law regulating wages, gratuities, benefits or other compensation lawfully due to employees.Section 3. Notice.(a) Summary.--The department shall develop and make available to employers on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a plain language, easy-to-understand summary on wage theft. The department shall furnish, on request by an employer, a copy of the summary without charging a fee. The summary shall include:(1) Examples of wage theft.(2) Citations to State law applicable to the examples.(3) Remedies and penalties applicable to the examples of 20250SB0487PN0459 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wage theft.(4) A statement indicating that wage theft is not limited to the examples and how to access information on other types of violations.(5) Information indicating how to report wage theft and limitations for filing a complaint.(6) A statement of employee protections for reporting wage theft and participating in a related investigation.(7) A reference to the requirements, penalties and protections established under this act.(8) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.(b) Notice of summary.--An employer shall provide notice to its employees no later than 90 days from the effective date of this section or at the time of hiring, of the summary under subsection (a).Section 4. Additional notice requirements.(a) Additional requirements.--An employer shall:(1) post the summary described under section 3(a) at the workplace in a conspicuous place where employees normally pass and can read it; or(2) make the summary continuously available to employees through a website, intranet, mobile application or other electronic or Internet service regularly used by the employer to communicate with employees. The employer shall notify each employee that the notice is available electronically, including how to access it.(b) Updates to information.--The department shall update as necessary the summary described under section 3(a) and post the updated summary on its publicly accessible Internet website in 20250SB0487PN0459 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 downloadable format. An employer shall, within 120 days of the date on which the department posts the updated summary on its publicly accessible Internet website, update the notices required under subsection (a) and section 3(a).Section 5. Criminal penalties.An employer that fails to provide notice to an employee as required under section 3(a), fails to comply with the requirements of section 4(a) and (b) or is found to be in violation of section 7(a) when a criminal penalty for the violation is not provided for under existing State law or regulation, commits a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $500.Section 6. Administrative penalties and civil enforcement.(a) Penalties.--If the secretary finds that an employer has violated this act and an administrative penalty for the violation is not provided for under existing State law or regulation, the secretary may assess and collect a civil penalty of not more than $500 per violation.(b) Factors to be considered.--When determining the amount of the penalty to be imposed, the secretary shall consider factors, including, but not limited to:(1) The history of previous violations.(2) The good faith of the employer.(3) The size of the employer's business.(c) Use of penalty funds.--Penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the account.(d) Enforcement proceedings.--The secretary may enforce this act in an enforcement proceeding authorized by and brought under The Minimum Wage Act, the Wage Payment and Collection Law, the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act or other State law 20250SB0487PN0459 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulating wages, gratuities, benefits or other compensation lawfully due to employees.Section 7. Retaliation prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--It shall be unlawful for an employer or officer or agent of an employer to take adverse action against a person in retaliation for exercising rights protected under this act, The Minimum Wage Act, the Wage Payment and Collection Law, the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act or other State law regulating wages, gratuities, benefits or other compensation lawfully due to employees. Rights protected under this section include, but are not limited to, the right to file a complaint, participate in an investigation or to inform any person about the provisions of, or an employer's noncompliance with, this act, The Minimum Wage Act, the Wage Payment and Collection Law, the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act or other State law regulating wages, gratuities, benefits or other compensation lawfully due to employees.(b) Rebuttable presumption.--Adverse action against a person within 90 days of the person's exercise of a right protected under this act, The Minimum Wage Act, the Wage Payment and Collection Law, the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act or other State law regulating wages, gratuities, benefits or other compensation lawfully due to employees, shall raise a rebuttable presumption of having done so in retaliation for the exercise of the right.(c) Relief authorized.--The secretary may order any relief necessary to make an employee whole for retaliation, including, but not limited to, payment of lost wages and benefits, reinstatement or other equitable relief.Section 8. Wage Theft Notification and Protection Restricted 20250SB0487PN0459 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Account.The Wage Theft Notification and Protection Restricted Account is established as a restricted account within the General Fund. The money in the account is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purposes of administering this act, The Minimum Wage Act, the Wage Payment and Collection Law, the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act or other State law regulating wages, gratuities, benefits or other compensation lawfully due to employees.Section 9. Report.By July 31, 2028, and every year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The report shall contain information on violations under this act from the preceding calendar year. The report shall also contain information on wage theft violations from the preceding calendar year, including:(1) The total number of violations.(2) A listing of employers classified by the nature of the violations and business industry.(3) A brief description of the violations for the employers listed.(4) The total number of workers impacted under each violation classification.(5) The total amount of wages and tax revenue unlawfully withheld from the violations.(6) A listing of other forms of compensation unlawfully 20250SB0487PN0459 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 withheld from the violations.(7) A summary of enforcement actions collectively taken in response to the violations.(8) Other information deemed necessary by the department.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in four months.20250SB0487PN0459 - 7 - 1234567